
Emerging Digital Technologies 
Ecosystems in Kenya and South Africa: 
States of Maturity 2023

Madara Ogot
Rebecca Hanlin
Margaret Muthee
Wandile Kelly
Samuel Njuguna
Rita Muriuki



© 2023 University of Nairobi, University of Johannesburg

This document is an output from a project funded with UK aid from the UK government for the benefit of developing countries. 
However, the views expressed and information contained in it is not necessarily those of, or endorsed by the UK government, which 
can accept no responsibility for such views or information or for any reliance placed on them.

           

Cover Image by Freepik available from freepik.com



Emerging Digital Technologies Ecosystems of
Kenya and South Africa: States of Maturity

2023

Prof Madara Ogot
Rita Muriuki

University of Nairobi
KENYA

Prof Rebecca Hanlin
Wandile Kelly

University of Johannesburg
SOUTH AFRICA

Margaret Muthee
Samuel Njuguna

NACOSTI
KENYA

University of Nairobi | University of Johannesburg





TABLE OF CONTENTS

1 INTRODUCTION 1

1.1 Background Information 1

1.2 Methodology 1

1.3 Emerging Technology Maturity Model 2

2 MATURITY OF THE EMERGING DIGITAL TECHNOLOGIES ECOSYSTEM IN KENYA 4

2.1 Introduction 4

2.2 Primary Actors 4

2.3 Secondary Actors 11

2.4 Maturity Level 13

2.5 Summary

3 MATURITY OF THE EMERGING DIGITAL TECHNOLOGY ECOSYSTEM IN SOUTH AFRICA 14

3.1  Primary Actors 14

3.2 Secondary Actors 20

3.3 Maturity Level 22

3.4 Summary 22

4 GENDER EQUALITY AND SOCIAL INCLUSION 23

4.1 Introduction 23

4.2 Gender Equality Analysis 23

4.3 Social Inclusion Analysis 24

4.4 Policy Areas for GESI in Emerging Digital Technologies 26

5 DISCUSSION AND RECOMMENDATIONS 26

5.1 Discussion 26

5.2  Key Findings 27

5.3 Recommendations 28

REFERENCES 30

Appendix A – Survey Instrument for Researchers and Innovators 34

Appendix B – Survey Instrument for Policy- Makers, Funders and Decision-Makers 36





1 INTRODUCTION

1.1 Background Information

Data generation is  growing exponentially,  driven by the rapid
increase  in  devices  such  as  mobile  phones,  computers,
sensors, etc., connected to the Internet and thus to databases.
The new data sources and technologies (e.g. machine learning
algorithms)  "can  identify  patterns  in  observed  data,  build
explanatory  models,  and  make  predictions  quicker  and  with
more  accuracy  than  humans".1 Emerging  digital  technologies
(EDT) and X-Data-based applications, for example, have been
used to develop mitigation measures against Malaria, Zika, and
Dengue Fever  in  India,  identify  lower-priced generic  drugs in
South Africa (SA)2  and tackle flooding in Indonesia.3 However,
these algorithms are mainly created in developed countries and
often lack transparency arising from intellectual property rights,
thus hindering the realisation of the enormous potential EDT/X-
Data-based  applications  have  in  addressing  socio-economic
challenges faced by developing countries, where data literacy
levels  are  also  often  insufficient  to  leverage  on  data-driven
approaches fully.4  In addition, where applications do exist, they
are often not broadly accessible, especially for vulnerable and
marginalised groups and persons with disabilities in areas with
slow internet connections. 

This  study  unpacks  the  generic  term  "big  data"  into  four
overlapping  categories  of  data:  big  data,  open  data,  user-
generated  data  and  real-time  data,  and  collectively  refers  to
them as "X-Data". Reaping the full benefits of X-Data requires
the  development  of  supportive  systems,  including  more
approaches to collect, aggregate, analyse, and visualise data,
as well as building the capacity of communities involved in data
generation,  governance, and usage.5 Such systems are often
limited  or  absent  in  developing  countries,  thus  creating  new
digital  divides  between  developing  and  developed  countries.
Whereas the access to technology gap is narrowing, gaps in
social integration and the impact of technology are increasing.6

Further,  barriers  persist  in  the  use  and uptake  of  X-Data  by
decision-makers,  including competing data sources,  quality  of
data,  limited  awareness  of  data  existence,  and  inadequate
transformation of  data into useful  information or  tailoring it  to
match decision-makers needs.7

EDT are often used together and include artificial  intelligence
(AI),  blockchain,  Geographic  Information  Systems  (GIS),
Internet  of  Things  (IoT),  and  big  data  analytics.  AI  includes
systems, techniques and methods that incorporate human-level
intelligence at  much faster  speeds,  for  example,  data  mining
(including  artificial  neural  networks,  Bayesian  networks  and
support vector machines), machine learning, natural language
processing, computer vision, and expert systems.8 Collectively,
they provide enhanced data analytics, better decision-making,
and improved predictive analysis. 

Kenya and South Africa have for the past few years ranked high
in Sub-Saharan Africa (Kenya: 4/41 in 2020 and 3/41 in 2021
and 2022; and South Africa: 2/41 in 2020, 2021 and 2022) and
reasonably well globally (Kenya: 71/172 in 2020, 78/160 in 2021

1 Wesolowski et al (2013)
2 Wesolowski et al (2013)
3 openup.org.za
4 petajakarta.org
5 Joubert et al (2021)
6 GIZ (2014)
7 Wesolowski et al (2013)
8 Mgala, M. (2020)

and 90/181 2022; and South Africa: 58/172 in 2020, 68/160 in
2021 and 68/181 in  2022)  on the Government  AI  Readiness
Index.9 The  index  evaluates  how  ready  a  government  is  to
implement AI in delivering public services. However, the Sub-
Saharan African countries have the lowest average scores on
households with internet access and the cost of the cheapest
internet-enabled  device  relative  to  Gross  Domestic  Product
(GDP) per capita.10

A definition of GIS is a computer system for capturing, storing,
checking,  and displaying  data  related  to  positions  on  Earth's
surface. GIS can show different data types on one map, such as
streets, buildings, and vegetation, enabling easier visualisation,
analysis, and understanding of patterns and relationships.11 The
hardware and software systems incorporate many data types,
including cartographic, photographic and digital data.

Big data combines structured, semi-structured and unstructured
data collected by organisations. Big data analytics mines this
data  for  information  for  machine  learning  projects,  predictive
modelling,  and other advanced analytic  applications to create
value. Characteristics include great variety, high volume and the
need for faster processing times. Blockchains are decentralised
databases that permanently,  without third parties, record user
transactions.  The  transactions  are  cryptographically  chained
(thus cannot be altered) and shared with the linked users. 

A definition of IoT is a network of things embedded with sensors,
software, and other technologies. They connect and exchange
data with other devices and systems through the Internet. Using
low-cost computing, the internet cloud, big data analytics and
mobile  technologies,  physical  objects  (ranging  from everyday
household  appliances  to  complex  industrial  applications)  can
share and collect data with minimal human intervention.

This  study  aimed  to  take  a  deep  dive  into  and  assess  the
maturity  level  of  the  EDT  ecosystems  in  Kenya  and  South
Africa, focussing on their applications in the context of X-Data. It
builds upon the United Kingdom (UK), Foreign Commonwealth
Development Organization (FCDO) – Funded project; Emerging
technologies  in  Kenya  and  South  Africa  -  A  Landscape
Analysis.12 

1.2 Methodology

The approach involved an in-depth literature review, a review of
the policy and regulatory environment, stakeholder engagement
through interviews/surveys, and an assessment of the maturity
of the emerging digital  technologies ecosystem in Kenya and
South  Africa.  The  literature  review  followed  a  multi-vocal
systematic approach13 of both peer-reviewed academic articles
and grey literature covering the development and use of EDT in
Kenya. The grey literature reviewed focussed on reports, trade
journals,  technical  papers,  books  and  book  chapters.  The
governance  frameworks,  embodied  in  policies,  laws,  and
regulations  relevant  to  EDT  and  arising  from  the  literature
review, were identified and synthesised, providing an overview
of the regulatory and policy environment. 

Maturity or development stage models of an ecosystem provide
tools for assessment of where an ecosystem is in its life cycle.
They  provide  insights  into  the  status  of  recognised  success

9 openup.org.za
10 National Geographic Society, 
www.nationalgeographic.org/encyclopedia/geographic-information-system-gis/
11 petajakarta.org
12 Madara et al., (2022); Hanlin et al., (2022)
13 Joubert et al (2021)

1



factors  essential  for  the  ecosystem's  maturity,  health,  and
sustainability.  For  example,  the  Ecosystems  Connections
Mapping  Project  developed  a  model  to  establish  the
development stage of localised start-up ecosystems. It defined
three  development  stages  (nascent,  advancing,  and  mature)
based  on  measurable  metrics  linked  to  the  dimensions  of
community,  skills,  supporting  infrastructure,  investment,  and
constraints. The World Bank used the methodology to assess
the development stages of start-up ecosystems in several cities,
including Bogata, Dar es Salaam, Cairo, London, New York, and
Singapore.14 The  International  Telecommunications  Union
developed an ecosystem maturity  model  whose development
stages  followed  the  entrepreneurship  cycle:  pre-idea  and
culture,  ideation,  start-up,  valley  of  death,  and  SME.  These
stages are evaluated based on five dimensions corresponding
to  critical  stakeholders:  entrepreneurs,  finance,  support,
corporate,  academia,  and government.15 A maturity  model  for
software  start-up  ecosystems  was  developed  with  four
development  stages:  nascent,  evolving,  mature,  and  self-
sustaining.16  These  stages  are  assessed  along  eight
dimensions:  existing  strategies,  entrepreneurship  universities,
angel funding, culture values for entrepreneurship, specialised
media,  ecosystem data and research,  ecosystem generations
and events. These models, however, do not adequately capture
the peculiarities nor  properly  define the stages of  maturity  of
EDT.  An  emerging  technologies  ecosystem  maturity  model
developed  by  Ogot  et  al.17 was  used  for  this  study.  A brief
description of the model follows.

1.3 Emerging Technology Maturity Model

The emerging technologies maturity model is based on the five
fundamental activities of the innovation processes framework.18

The activities—education,  research (basic  developmental,
engineering),  implementation (manufacturing,  deployment),
end-use (customers of  the product  or  process),  and  linkages
(bringing together  complementary knowledge)—are performed
or supported by primary and secondary actors and institutions.
Collectively,  they  form  the  critical  elements  of  an  innovation
system. Table 1.1 presents their relationships. 

14 World Bank (2017)
15 GIZ (2014)

16 Cuiker (2017)
17 Ogot et al., (2022); Hanlin et al., (2022)
18 Wesolowski et al (2013)

Education focuses  on  the  university  level  Higher  Education
Institutions (HEIs) that provide the ecosystem with a continuous
stream  of  new  knowledge  (for  example,  publications  and
patents) and new carriers of knowledge (students). They create
"qualified personnel [in the ETs] who can monitor technological
and other trends, assess their relevance to the prospects for the
country and individual firms, and help to develop a strategy for
reacting  to  and  taking  advantage  of  those  trends".19 On  the
other hand, research embodies basic research carried out by
universities  and  research  institutes.  (Universities,  research
institutes,  and  industry  conduct  research  development,  while
industry  mainly  performs  engineering  research).  End-use
embodies the final consumers of the developed products and
services and ranges from individual consumers to society. Their
strong and visible changes in preferences influence the setting
of Research and development (R&D) priorities and technological
change direction.  

Linkages between  the  actors  are  essential  for  successful
innovation,  diffusion,  and  exploitation  (Liu  and  White,  2001).
However,  effective  connections within  innovation systems still
need to be improved in developing countries, including Kenya.
Finally,  implementation involves  the  conversion  of  research
(knowledge) using linkages (networks) and end-use (markets) to
exploit  new  business  opportunities.  The  key  actors  are  the
entrepreneurs,  the  start-ups,  and  existing  businesses
(diversifying their business strategy to take advantage of new
developments and opportunities). New technologies often only
compete  with  existing  entrenched  technologies  if  they  are
disruptive.  Consequently,  organisations  must  implement
strategies to support their diffusion into the market.

Primary actors are the organisations that perform one or more of
the  five  fundamental  activities,  including  governments,
universities,  research institutes,  and private enterprises.  They
also  include  bridging  institutions  that  act  as  intermediaries
(linkages) between the different actors, for example, research
councils  and  associations  linking  research  organisations  and
government,20 science  and  technology  parks,  incubators  and
accelerators. Secondary actors are mainly relevant government
ministries/departments/agencies  (MDAs)  and  funding
institutions.  Their  actions  include  enacting  facilitative  foreign
direct  investment  policies,  ensuring  substantial  intellectual
property  rights  to  provide  an  incentive  for  multinational

19 Ogot et al (2022); Hanlin et al (2022)
20 Feinson (2003)

2



companies  to  conduct  research  locally;21 directly  funding
research and financing utilisation of the research outputs; and
establishing  a  favourable  regulatory  environment.22 Funding
institutions,  including  banks,  equity  funds,  venture  capitalists,
and angel investors, support implementation activities. Finally,
institutions capture  the  norms,  rules  and  environment  that
influence  the  decisions  and  actions  of  system actors.23 They
include the political establishment, for example, parliament and
the judiciary,  which determine the extent to which democratic
governance or the tolerance for and the nurturing of a culture of
corruption, both of which can serve as barriers or enablers to
innovation.24 Table  1.2  presents  indicators  for  each  of  the
fundamental activities.

The  emerging  technologies  maturity  model  defines  three
developmental stages: ideation, nascent, and growth as the final
stage.  A mature  development  stage,  typical  in  other  maturity
models,  is  absent  as  a  stage  of  maturity  implies  that  the
technology is no longer emerging. The ideation stage is beyond
basic research and testing fundamental  principles.  It  includes
R&D activities with pilots and proof-of-concepts performed on
potential commercial applications. The nascent stage embodies
the  early  development  and  formation  of  the  ecosystem.
Characteristics  include  extreme  ambiguity  driven  by
technological  uncertainties,  competition,  structures  and
demands. There is generally still a lack of governance structures
and clear guidance on value propositions (the value to create,
who to create it for, and how to create it) as well as the systems
for value creation and value capture;25  Commercial  ventures
have been formed, and sales have begun. Finally, in the growth
stage,  the  commercial  applications  of  the  technology  start
gaining strong acceptance in the market with increased demand
and new entrants, and the ecosystem governance structures are
becoming more evident. Table 1.3 presents' indicators metrics
for the three maturity stages. 

Detailed  stakeholder  mapping  of  the  emerging  digital
technologies actors in both countries, previously performed in

21 Ibid
22 Smith and Sharmistha (2010)
23 Lundvall et al (2006)
24 Cukier (2017)
25 Ogot et al. (2023)

an  earlier  project,26 were  updated.  Questionnaires  were
developed and sent to a sample of two groups of stakeholders
in  each  country:   (a)  researchers  and  innovators  and  (b)
policymakers,  funders,  and  decision-makers.  Copies  of  the
questionnaires  are  in  Appendix  A and  B.  The  questionnaires
were mainly composed of Likert-Scale type questions with a few
open-ended questions. For the latter, analyses of the responses
employed  qualitative  content  analysis  (QCA),  defined  as
“qualitative data reduction and sense-making effort that takes a
volume  of  qualitative  material  and  attempts  to  identify  core
consistencies and meanings.”27 It  is  inductive,  "grounding the
examination of topics and themes, as well as inferences drawn
from them, in the data."28 and is based on the grounded theory
approach. The focus, therefore, is to determine unique themes
that can illustrate a range of interpretations of the issue at hand.
Using QCA provides good contrast  and directly  complements
the  quantitative  approach  used  in  the  first  half  of  the
questionnaire,  where  the  interventions  for  interrogation  were
predetermined. QCA extracts the proposed interventions from
the stakeholder's responses.

The analysis used emergent themes as the unit  of  measure.
These  were  expressed  by  a  few  words,  phrases  or  whole
paragraphs.  The  key  focus  was  the  expression  of  an  idea.
Development  of  the  themes  from  the  responses  used  the
constant  comparative  method  that  involved  the  systematic
comparison of text assigned to a theme with the text already
assigned  to  it  to  ensure  consistency  and  to  understand  the
theoretical  properties  of  the  category  better.  These  were
captured  and  continually  updated  in  a  coding  table.  The
responses were analysed several times to ensure accuracy and
completeness. The themes were changed, and the coding table
was updated accordingly when necessary.

The collected primary and secondary data formed the basis for
assessing  the  maturity  levels  of  the  emerging  digital
technologies ecosystems in both countries.

26 Ogot et. (2022); Hanlin et al., (2022)
27 Patton, M.Q. (2002)
28 Zhang, Y. and Wildemuth, B. (Unpublished) 

3



2. MATURITY OF THE EMERGING DIGITAL 
TECHNOLOGIES ECOSYSTEM IN KENYA

2.1 Introduction

The  following  sections  discuss  the  level  and  details  of  the
primary  and  secondary  actors'  activity  in  Kenya's  emerging
digital  technologies  ecosystem.  Their  assessment  provided
insight into the maturity level of the ecosystem.

2.2 Primary Actors

Perspectives were obtained from twenty-five  researchers  and
innovators  from  across  Kenya  to  supplement  the  collected
secondary data. They included members from the private and
public  sectors,  with  52% from academia,  20% from research
institutions and 28% from the private sector.  The participants
included  research  scientists  (24%),  lecturers  (24%),  ICT and

innovation  directors  (16%),  and  data  analysts  (8%)  among
others.  Further,  88% of  the participants were male,  and only
12%  were  female.  These  proportions  reveal  the  prevailing
gender disparities in the ecosystem. 

All  participants  had  post-graduate  degrees,  with  72%  of  the
respondents having a Master's degree as the highest academic
qualification and 28% having a PhD. Further,  the participants
possessed varied levels of experience in academia or research,
ranging from below 5 to 25 years, specifically, 8% with over 15
years  of  experience  in  academia  and  research,  48%  with
between 6 to 15 years of experience, and 44% with below five
years  of  experience.  The  following  sections  present  the
secondary data analysis and the primary actors' perspectives.

Education

The  percentage  of  universities  offering  undergraduate  EDT-
related  programmes  (excluding  GIS,  whose  programmes  are
separate)  was 52.4%. The programmes produce an excellent

4



human resource for developing products and services based on
current technologies. The EDT-related programmes dramatically
dropped  at  the  Masters  level  and  fell  further  for  Ph.D.
programmes,  where only  12.7% and 6.3% of  the universities
offered related programmes. As a result,  the country remains
weak in developing new EDT, typically undertaken by Masters
and PhD students and graduates.  For  GIS,  the proportion of
universities  offering  related  undergraduate  programmes  was
11.1%, with  only  6.3% and 3.2% offering the programmes at
Masters and PhD levels, respectively.29 Therefore, there needs
to be a more robust human resource pipeline supporting local
research and development of GIS-related applications.

Primary  data  analysis  from  a  sample  of  researchers  and
innovators revealed that 56% had undertaken various courses
and  training  on  EDT  and  X-Data  (see  Table  2.1).  Such
undertakings are essential  in building capacity and enhancing
experts' potential in the ecosystem.  

Table 2.1: EDT/X-Data-Related Courses Attended by 
Surveyed Researchers and Innovators in Kenya

Course
No. of

participants Percent

Big data and analytics 7 50%

Internet of Things 3 21%

Artificial Intelligence 2 14%

GIS 2 14%

Cloud Computing 1 7%

Open data 1 7%

Machine learning 1 7%

Innovation Sandbox 1 7%

TVET institutions train hands-on workers for industry, and their
students produce many innovative products. Many innovations
come  from  industry,  emanating  from  solving  production  and
process  challenges.30.  TVETS  significantly  contribute  to
innovation  by  prototyping  and  designing  innovative  products.
Their teaching methods that combine knowledge and skills are
very effective in innovation development, key to the exploitation
of EDT31. Innovations include the solar-powered vehicle with a
mobile  application  to  detect  obstacles  and  prevent  accidents
from  Nyeri  National  Polytechnic  and  smart  water  meters  by
Eldoret National Polytechnic, among others. TVETs have other
innovations that  can be enhanced using EDT,  including solar
desalination machines, irrigation pumps and systems, driers and
cookers. 

TVET institutions have a critical role in innovation development
and  implementation  processes  by  acting  as  mechanisms  of
skills formation and diffusion. Developing and implementing vo-
cational curricula are some of the most fundamental activities in
TVET systems, especially considering the recent impacts of new

29 Ganter de Otero, Jan Peter (2019)
30 openup.org.za
31 Ganter de Otero, Jan Peter, 2019, Innovation in TVET: UNESCO-UNEVOC 
Trends Mapping. UNESCO-UNEVOC International Centre for Technical and 
Vocational Education and Training

technologies related to industrial automation or the changes in
working environments and practices.32

Poor performance in the Kenya Certificate of Primary Education
(KCPE)  exams  often  serves  as  a  strong  indicator  of  those
students not meeting their career aspirations. AI tools were used
to identify  students who needed intervention to  improve their
KCPE exam performance two years before the exam. Based on
student records, the intervention prediction models in the pilot
study  were  relatively  accurate  in  enabling  educators  to  take
appropriate measures early enough.33 IBM Research Africa has
been working  with  RTI  International  to  use  AI,  cognitive  and
mobile technologies targeting schools where students have a
high risk of failure. The initiative captures data, including class
size,  grades,  and  school  resources,  to  propose  various
interventions.  IBM  is  also  exploring  AI  technology  that  can
support  students  in  Nairobi  to  personalise  their  learning
experience.34

Research

The recent entrance of multi-national and development partners
in R&D centres has increased research actors. The centres are
tapping into local expertise to conduct contextualised R&D while
acting as nodes within their global R&D activities. For example,
the Microsoft Africa Development Centre (in Nairobi since 2019)
is  working  on  software  engineering,  machine  learning,  data
science, market research, and ICT infrastructure. IBM Research
Africa,  anchored  in  Kenya  and  South  Africa,  is  an  industrial
research facility that seeks to "drive innovation by developing
commercially viable solutions to transform lives and spark new
business  opportunities."   Their  digital  products,  based on  AI,
blockchain, and data analytics (among others), support water,
agriculture,  transportation,  healthcare,  financial  inclusion,
education, energy, security and e-government businesses.  

Despite the apparent growth in EDT applications in Kenya, the
absence  of  significant  R&D  has  resulted  in  most  deployed
applications  relying  on  non-African  technologies.  As  a  result,
they often lack contextual relevance, especially about aspects of
culture and infrastructure (Oxford Insights and IDRC, 2019). The
main  areas  of  EDT research  were  agricultural,  conservation,
education,  fintech,  governance,  and  health  sectors.  For
example,  of  the  surveyed  stakeholders,  48%  worked  in
agriculture,  another 28% in health and the remaining 12% in
governance (see Table 2.2). 

The study participants'  research touched on all  the stages of
development  from  Just  Starting  to  Ready  for
Deployment/Commercialisation  or  Publication  (see Figure 2.1).
Although 32% indicated they would  likely  file  for  a  patent  or
copyright  in  the  next  year,  none  had  previously  filed  one.
Examples of EDT/X-data research and innovations from various
sectors follow.

Agriculture

The Kenya Marine and Fisheries Research Institute has been
working  with  international  partners  to  use  unmanned  aerial
systems  (drones),  high-resolution  satellite  imagery,  and
Geographic  Information Systems (GIS)  to  map the spread of
tilapia  cages  on  the  Kenya  part  of  Lake  Victoria.  This  data-

32 National Geographic Society, 
www.nationalgeographic.org/encyclopedia/geographic-information-system-gis/
33 petajakarta.org
34Ogot et al., 2022; Hanlin et al., 2022.

5



intensive system provides spatial and change detection, yielding
a deeper understanding of the impacts of growth in commercial
fish cage culture.35

Table  2.2:  Sectors  Targeted  by  Surveyed  EDT/X-Data
Researchers and Innovators in Kenya

Sector No. Percent

Agriculture 12 48%

Health 7 28%

Governance 3 12%

Creative arts 1 4%

Marketing 1 4%

Cities 1 4%

Conservation 1 4%

Cyberspace 1 4%

Fisheries and Aquaculture 1 4%

Livelihoods 1 4%

Safety and Security 1 4%

Transport 1 4%

Figure 2.1: Stage of Current EDT/X-Data Research Activities
of Surveyed EDT/X-Data Researchers and Innovators in 
Kenya

The Kenya  Agricultural  and  Livestock  Research  Organization
(KALRO), through the Kenya Climate-Smart Agriculture Project
(KCSAP)  and  the  National  Agricultural  and  Rural  Inclusive
Growth Project, has established a big data platform to transform
the agriculture and food system in the country. The platform has
enabled KALRO to integrate agro-weather data,  market  data,
and farmer data to  provide customised geospatial  and timely
agro-weather  and  market  information  to  farmers  and
policymakers36.

Conservation

Researchers  at  Dedan  Kimathi  University  have  created  a
camera  trap  data  set  of  six  wildlife  species  captured  in  a
conservancy  in  Nyeri.  Zoologists,  ecologists  and  researchers

35 Hamilton et al. (2020)
36 https://olc.worldbank.org/print/content/digital-ag-series-big-data-platform-
scaling-data-driven-digital-agriculture-learnings-kenya

use camera traps to acquire wild animal images non-intrusively
for ecological and conservation research. The dataset that has
been made globally available has over 10 thousand images.37 

Governance

Hate speech propagated over social  media platforms through
text messages, pictures, videos, emojis, etc., is becoming a big
problem  worldwide,  often  with  deadly  consequences.  Hate
speech distributed over social media is more challenging than
traditional media (for example, newspapers, TV, and radio) as it
can be quickly produced and distributed anonymously at a low
cost,  potentially  reaching  a  global  audience  in  real  time.
Researchers in Kenya have been working on AI models that can
detect  political  hate  speech  propagated  over  social  media
platforms.38

Health

Inadequate  access  to  microscopy  diagnostics  remains  a
problem in limited resource settings, which impedes diagnosing
and  treating  common  and  treatable  conditions.  Digital
microscopy  and  artificial  intelligence  using  deep  learning
present opportunities to address these challenges.39 A team of
researchers  conducted  a  pilot  study  in  Kinondo  to  establish
whether  point-of-care  digital  microscopy  and  AI-based
assessment of samples (through image and signal processing)
can  analyse  cervical  cancer  test  results.  Cervical  cancer  is
highly preventable yet remains a common and deadly disease in
areas  without  screening  programmes  due  to  a  lack  of
pathologists.  Their  AI-supported approach was able  to  detect
atypical  cervical  smears  with  the  same high  sensitivity  as  a
visual analysis done by a pathologist.40  IBM Research Africa is
developing  computational  platforms  and  tools  (for  example,
understanding  natural  language  and  images,  bioinformatics)
enabling the mining of biological and medical data to transform
the  prevention,  diagnosis,  treatment  and  management  of
disease, with a current focus on tuberculosis and HIV.41

The Kenya Health  Management  Information System (KHMIS)
project  develops  and  maintains  an  integrated  National  Data
Warehouse (NDW) for anonymised patient-level data. The NDW
acts  as  a  repository  and  analytics  platform  through  the
connection, collation, and aggregation of patient data from all
electronic medical records in the country42. It hosts de-identified
data to facilitate programmatic monitoring of Health Information
System  implementations  and  progress  on  clinical  care  and
outcomes  for  HIV-infected  and  exposed  persons.
Also,researchers at Jomo Kenyatta University of Agriculture and
Technology  are  researching  data  analytics,  specifically
incorporating  data  visualisation  to  develop  techniques  to
strengthen  healthcare  insurance  management.  The  approach
can provide deeper insights into healthcare insurance data by
revealing  previously  undetected  data  integrity  issues,  cost
management pointers, case management insights and scheme
performance, thereby guiding premium entitlement and ailment
cost burden management.43 

Primary  data  from  surveyed  researchers  and  innovators
revealed that machine learning is the most commonly used EDT
(44%), followed by AI (24%), as shown in Figure 2.2. Also, the

37 https://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2352340922010666
38 Mahony et al., 2019
39 Beck, H.P., 2022
40 Holmstrom et al (2021)
41 Ganter de Otero, Jan Peter (2019)
42 https://kenyahmis.org/documentation/summary-national-data-warehouse/
43 https://www.jkuat.ac.ke/big-data-poised-to-revolutionise-healthcare-industry/

6



most  frequently  used  data  source  is  real-time  data  (44%),
followed by user-generated data (32%). 

Journal  publications  are  critical  research  outputs  in
disseminating research findings and knowledge transfer. Table
2.3 presents journal publications output related to EDT/X-Data
from  our  participants.  56%  of  the  them  had  published  their
research outputs in journals with the distributions shown therein.

Researchers  and  Innovator  participants  were  asked  to  state
three challenges they faced. The QCA analysis revealed four
emergent themes: Inadequate resources, data, researchers and
innovator aspects, and commercialisation. Table 2.4 presents a
description  of  each  of  the  themes  that  emerged,  sample
quotations from the respondents,  thereby placing the derived
theme in a better context, when the coding was used and how
many times different respondents proposed the themes. Areas
submitted by only one respondent were omitted.  The themes
provided  suggestions  for  possible  intervention  areas  to
strengthen the EDT/X-Data ecosystem. Overwhelming, the main
challenge faced by researchers and innovators was inadequate
resources, specifically computational and financial resources.

Table 2.3: Number of publications Directly Related to 
EDT/X-Data by Surveyed Researchers and Innovators in 
Kenya

No. of publications
No. of

Researchers Percent

0 11 44%

1 6 24%

2 1 4%

3 2 8%

4 1 4%

5 3 12%

6 1 4%

End Users

By March 31,  2023,  internet  subscriptions in  Kenya stood at
47.96 million, out of which 67.1% were on mobile broadband44.
There were 66.1 million mobile (SIM) subscriptions, translating
to a mobile (SIM) penetration rate of 130.5% (greater than 100%
as  many  people  had  more  than  one  SIM).  Mobile  money
subscriptions stood at 38.4 million, translating to a penetration
rate of 76%. At the same time, the number of mobile devices
was 62.96 million,  translating to  a  device penetration rate  of
124.5%.  The  penetration  rate  for  feature  phones  and
smartphones  was  66.2%  and  58.3%,  respectively.  Although
there is a low gender gap in mobile usage, a significant gap
persists in Internet usage. Mobile money services, led by  M-
Pesa, have driven high mobile use by both men and women and
have  significantly  increased  financial  inclusion.  The  mobile
gender gap stands at only 6%.  

Source: Statistica data for 2020, viewed May 2023

Figure 2.3. What is the Kenya Digital Citizen Doing?

44 https://www.ca.go.ke/mobile-subscriptions-hit-66m-march-2023

7



The  Internet  usage  gap  between  men  and  women  is  much
higher  at  38%.45  The  digital  gender  divide  presents  a  big
challenge  for  women  in  Kenya  to  participate  fully  as  digital
citizens. A significant gap also exists between rural and urban
areas. Estimated access to the Internet is 44% in urban areas
and only 17% in rural areas. Rural communities remain largely
unconnected  or  use  only  essential  digital  services  due  to
affordability barriers to the required digital tools (mobile phones,
Internet access, computers) and lack of basic digital skills. 

Micro,  Small  and Medium Enterprises are often end-users of
EDT but need more expertise to implement solutions that could
boost their businesses. Companies such as Fastagger in Kenya
provide them with the knowledge and solutions customised to
the enterprise's needs. Specifically, they use AI- and blockchain-

45Fastagger, fastagger.com

powered  analytics  to  harness  the  potential  of  data  to  help
MSMEs grow by increasing sales and loyalty.  Their  platforms
process large amounts of data to identify customer patterns and
trends that are difficult to detect manually.46

Finally, a study of sentiments of tweets over five years (2016-
2021) on Kenya's Twitter platform relating to the use of AI to
further the country's socio-economic development was largely
positive, with 51.5% of the tweets on the topic positive, 49%
neutral  and none negative. This optimism may be due to the
young  EDT ecosystem in  Kenya,  compared  to  South  Africa,
where the development  and adoption of  EDT,  such as AI,  is
more widespread and practised that the public may be past a

46 Joubert et al. (2021)

8



"techno-optimism"  phase  as  possible  being  experience  in
Kenya.47

Linkages

Linkages  within  the  digital  ETs  ecosystem  were  primarily
through innovation hubs, incubators, accelerators and industry
associations. Examples include iHub in Nairobi, with an Open
IoT programme launched  in  September  2020  (in  partnership
with  GSMA Africa)  as  a  pan-African IoT community  platform,
facilitating conversations supporting the growth of  the African
IoT ecosystem; Ibiz Africa, a business incubator that focuses on
ICT solutions and based at Strathmore University; and NaiLab,
an ICT incubator that provides a simplified platform providing
innovators visibility and
access  to  venture
capitalists  and
business  angels  and
investors.48

Knowledge  transfer
between academia and
industry is an essential
driver of innovation and
economic  growth  as  it
eases  the
commercialisation  of
new  scientific
knowledge  within
firms.49 Knowledge
Transfer  Offices
(KTOs)  have  been
established  in
universities to  serve as innovation linkage intermediaries and
facilitate  transfer  activities,   for  example,  spin-off  creation
support, patent protection and licensing. Institutions with KTOs
include  Strathmore  University,  University  of  Nairobi,  Dedan
Kimathi University of Technology, Jomo Kenyatta University of
Agriculture  and  Technology,  Kenyatta  University,  Meru
University of Science and Technology and the Kenya Industrial
Research and Development Institute.

Industry  associations  are  non-profit  organisations  with
specialised  knowledge  and  capabilities  performing  innovation
enabler roles. They are an enabler of innovation by identifying
and legitimising firms, for example, creating industry directories;
facilitating  the  creation  of  inter-firm  relations,  for  example,
through networking activities; and by providing increased access
to resources through network brokerage activities, for example,
providing access to knowledge in universities and opportunities
in  foreign  markets.  50.  Examples  of  industry  associations  in
Kenya  include  the  Global  Innovation  Society  of  Kenya,  an
association  of  progressive  innovators  with  a  mandate  of
addressing  the  challenges  facing  startups  and  small  and
medium enterprises  (SMEs)  in  Kenya  under  the  umbrella  of
Kenya  Private  Sector  Alliance;  Association  of  Countywide
Innovation Hubs, an association of hubs located outside Nairobi,
whose main objective is to promote activities and programs of
the  member  hubs  and  supporting  their  vision  of  testing  and
building impactful  sustainable businesses in rural  and second
tire towns of Kenya; Association of FinTechs in Kenya, driving
the  adoption  of  digital  innovation  as  a  core  strategy  for

47 Ogot et al., (2022); Hanlin et al., (2022)
48Hamilton et al. (2020)
49 Dalziel, Margaret. (2006)
50 Ibid

efficiency, scalability, and competitive positioning in the financial
sector,  while  fostering  national,  regional  and  international
cooperation in digital innovation; and the Association of Startups
and  SMEs  Enablers  of  Kenya,  an  association  that  brings
together  and  represents  the  interests  of  organisations
supporting the development and growth of startups and SMEs.

Several annual conferences bring together players in the sector.
These include the Connected Summit,51 organised by the ICT
Authority and the Ministry of ICT since 2009. It brings together
over one thousand leaders, policymakers, industry champions
and  executives,  financiers,  ICT  innovators,  and  related
associations and networks, including the Computer Society of
Kenya  and  the  Kenya  ICT  Action  Network52.  The  Kenya

Innovation  Week
(KIW),  now  in  its
second  year,  is
organised by KeNIA to
provide  a  platform for
innovators,
entrepreneurs,
investors  and
government officials to
share  ideas  and
showcase  practical
skills  that  lead  to
innovation  and  with
impact  on  society53.
Also,  the  Nairobi
Innovation Week is an
annual  event
organised  by  the

University  of  Nairobi  to  celebrate  local  and  international
innovations, address critical issues in innovation management
and  build  Kenya's  innovation  ecosystem54.  Other  universities
and TVETs across the country have also organised innovation
weeks  to  provide  a  platform  for  showcasing  and  networking
among various actors in the ecosystem.   

The survey of researchers and innovators found that they took
advantage  of  several  platforms  for  learning,  networking  and
disseminating  their  work  outputs,  especially  conferences
attended, presented at, and organised, as shown in Figure 2.4.
However,  a  majority  of  researchers  had yet  to  attend (36%),
present  at  (52%)  or  organise  (68%)  a  conference  in  Kenya
touching on EDT/X-Data.

Research  collaboration,  especially  between  academia  and
industry, presents opportunities for learning, networking, pooling
of  resources  and  pathways  to  commercialisation,  thus
strengthening  the  ecosystem  through  linkages  between  the
actors.  Of  the  study  participants,  44%  had  and  continue  to
collaborate with industry (see Table 2.5).

Implementation

With the increase in EDT, organisations must create strategies
for their commercialisation. EDT innovations are disruptive and
are  rapidly  being  developed  in  many  forms,  touching  on  all
sectors of the economy. A commercialisation strategy is needed
to  expound  on  how  EDT  innovators  can  protect  their

51Computer Society of Kenya, cskoline.org
52 GIZ, (2006)

53 https://kenyainnovationweek.com
54https://vc4a.com/nairobi-innovation-week/

9



innovations, some of which are not patentable in the traditional
sense due to their nature as software applications. Thus, other
methods,  such  as  data  rights,  licensing  contracts  and
copyrights, are available for protection. Establishing a monetary
value  system  to  determine  EDT  value  for  licensing  and
contracting to investors shall prevent innovator exploitation.

Table  2.5:  Research  Collaborations  by  Surveyed  EDT/X-
Data Researchers and Innovators in Kenya

 Type of collaboration Researchers

Collaboration with industry in current 
research activities 44%

Collaboration with industry in past research 
activities 44%

Collaboration with other 
universities/research institutions in current 
research activities 32%

Collaboration with other 
universities/research institutions in past 
research activities 28%

The  institutionalisation  of  an  EDT commercialisation  process
must  firmly  be  established  in  the  Kenya  National  Innovation
Agency to address the fragmented approach from various public
and  private  sector  initiatives.  A  framework  to  guide  the
negotiation at the time of licensing and contracting needs to be
structured to avoid exploitation of innovators by investors where
the EDT owner can choose to remain as a founding director in
the startup, get royalties, or sell off the whole innovation. The
study found implementation of EDT mainly in the agricultural,
education,  financial,  health,  manufacturing  and  transport
sectors. Examples from each of the sectors follow.

Agriculture

Shamba Records,55 based in  Nairobi,  provides several  digital
tools  leveraging  AI  and  Blockchain  to  help  farmers  in  sub-
Saharan Africa increase their  yields,  become more profitable,
track  and  trace  their  crops,  and  exploit  new  market
opportunities.  For example,  their  real-time data collection tool
collects  farmer's  production  data,  linking  it  to  aggregation
centres and the market. The company automates payments to
the farmers, credit scoring, credit issuance, market linkage and
agricultural  extension  services  for  the  entire  process.  The
company leverages blockchain technologies to eliminate ghost
farmers and prevent manipulation of farm or harvest records.
The technology also underpins smart contracts between farmers
leasing  land  from  other  farmers.  In  2019,  more  than  six
thousand farmers in Kenya in the coffee, tea, and dairy sectors
were using the platform.

Education

Eneza  Education56 provides  revision  and  study  materials  for
learners 10 to 18 years old through an SMS system (for legacy
phones) or a web portal. Millions of students in Kenya, Ghana
and Cote d'Ivoire use the AI-based tutoring system to receive
quality and inclusive education.

Financial

55 https://www.shambarecords.com
56 https://enezaeducation.com

Developing  countries  are  increasingly  using  AI  to  develop
solutions  to  critical  challenges,  including  providing  financial
services to under and unserved populations. Machine learning
algorithms and the growth in digital users make using AI-based
credit scoring possible. For example, M-Shwari, a product of the
Kenya  telecom  giant  Safaricom,  uses  machine  learning
algorithms  to  predict  default  rate  probabilities  of  potential
borrowers to determine who to provide small loans to and the
maximum  amounts.  The  systems  use  non-traditional  data
resident  on  the  user's  devices,  including  mobile  phone  call
records,  mobile  money transactions data,  text  messages and
address books. The automated processes significantly reduce
the cost of providing these loans. By March 2023, the Digital
Financial  Services  Association  of  Kenya  (formerly  Digital
Lenders Association of Kenya) reported that digital lenders had
disbursed over Ksh500 billion in mobile loans to individuals and
small businesses.57

Utu Technologies is leveraging AI and blockchain to provide a
trust infrastructure on the Internet, replacing current anonymous
star ratings,  reviews and scores.  Their  software and platform
replace  these  approaches  with  AI-based  tools  that  adapt  to
users' preferences and context, allowing businesses to provide
personalised recommendations, thereby increasing conversions
and sales. They use blockchain to prevent the manipulation of
reviews and ratings.58 Pezesha leverages AI to provide a digital
lending infrastructure and marketplace that connects small and
medium businesses with working capital. Their system supports
alternative  credit  scoring  and  lending  infrastructure  as  a
service.59 Similarly, Cherehani Africa provides credit services by
leveraging  mobile-based  technology  to  provide  credit  and
distribute personalised financial literacy content to women and
adolescent girls who own micro-enterprises.60

Sarafu,  a community inclusion currency (vouchers) developed
by  Grassroots  Economics,  a  Kenyan  non-profit  foundation,
leverages blockchain to empower marginalised communities to
take charge of their livelihoods and economic futures. In 2020,
for  example,  the  "currency"  was  used  by  over  forty-one
thousand people in 60 villages across Kenya.  They performed
over 335,000 transactions using their mobile phones, equivalent
to  $2.5  million.  Through  USSD phone  technology,  users  can
access the platform without the Internet. Community inclusion
currencies  enable  groups  to  come  together,  form  their
currencies  and  build  a  resilient  economic  system  from  the
bottom up. In July 2023, there were over 13,000 transactions.61

Health

Health informatics is the acquisition, storage, retrieval and use
of healthcare information to improve the care of patients during
their  interactions  with  the  health  system.  Electronic  medical
records  combined  with  AI  provide  opportunities  to  improve
patient care, decision-making and public health informatics.62 A
commercialised AI and blockchain-based digital platform,  Afya
AfyaRekod63,  is  premised  on  the  notion  that  patients  should
maintain the sovereign ownership right of their health data. The
electronic medical records platform allows health facilities and
patients to use the data to make informed decisions, resulting in

57 https://www.money254.co.ke/post/kenyans-make-a-comeback-to-mobile-
loans-as-inflation-continues-to-bite-money-weekly
58 https://utu.io
59 https://pezesha.com
60 https://cherehani.org
61 https://www.grassrootseconomics.org/pages/sarafu-network
62 Lee & Kim, (2021)
63 https://afyarekod.com

10



doctors  providing  better  healthcare.  The  platform  enables
doctors to manage patients' health data in real-time and access
patients' data from all health facilities they have visited. On a
broader scale, anonymised data supports disease tracking and
outbreak  and  pandemic  mapping.  Also,  Bora,  an  electronic
medical  records system, has been used in Kenya to improve
maternal  and child  health  and HIV treatment.  The 2015 pilot
study found that the system helped to close critical care gaps.64

Manufacturing

NumeralIOT is an electronic design and manufacturing company
that has developed products and services that leverage AI and
IoT.  They  also  provide  electronic  design  and  manufacturing
support to other businesses. Examples of their products include
4G speed governor, vehicle tracking and security devices and
cashless payment solutions.65

Transport

Hello Tractor, a company that started in Nigeria and is now also
based in Nairobi, has developed an IoT platform to connect farm
equipment owners, dealers and banks with farmers who need
those  services.  The  platform  simplifies  and  makes  fleet
management  more  profitable.  It  supports  every  aspect  of  a
tractor  fleet,  from the  operators  to  the  farmer  customers,  by
enabling the farmer to request affordable tractor services and
providing  enhanced  security  to  the  owners  of  the  tractors
through  remote  asset  tracking  (using  Global  Positioning
Systems  –  GPS)  and  virtual  monitoring  (fuel  management,
driver management, fraud reduction).66

The  study  sought  the  perspectives  of  ten  policymakers  and
decision-makers (see Appendix B). The participants were 60%
male and 40% female.

2.2 Secondary Actors

Governance Frameworks

The government has adopted an approach to EDT that protects
citizens,  ensures fair  markets,  and enforces regulations while
enabling technologies and businesses to thrive. This approach
embraces:67

(a) adaptive  regulation  that  encourages  a  shift  from
"regulate  and  forget"  to  a  responsive,  interactive
approach; 

(b) regulatory sandboxes and accelerators for prototyping
and testing of new systems; 

(c) outcome-based regulations that focus on results and
performance rather than form;

(d) risk-weighted regulation that moves from one-size-fits-
all regulations to a data-driven, segmented approach;
and 

(e) collaborative  regulations  developed  by  engaging  a
broad set  of  players  across the ecosystem to  align
national and international regulations.  

The key ministries and agencies active in the ecosystem include
the  Ministry  of  ICT,  Innovation  and  Youth  Affairs,  which
developed and is implementing the National ICT Policy (2019).
The policy provides a proactive framework to guide the orderly
development  of  the ICT sector;  the Communication Authority,
among others, issued guidelines on the use of IoT devices; the

64 Haskew et al. (2015a), Haskew et al. (2015b)
65 https://www.numeraliot.com
66 https://hellotractor.com
67Kenya ICT Action Network, kictaet.net

Kenya Civil Aviation Authority issued regulations on the use of
drones;  the  Central  Bank  of  Kenya  published  guidelines  on
blockchain-based cryptocurrencies; and  the Office of the Data
Protection Commissioner whose mission is to protect personal
data through compliance, enforcement,  public awareness and
institutional capacity development. Additional government plans
guiding the sector include the Digital Economy Blueprint (2019)
and the Kenya National Digital Masterplan (2022). 

Further,  to  ensure  a  responsive,  robust  and  innovative
regulatory  environment,  the  Ministry  of  Information,
Communications and Digital Economy in 2023 is updating the
Kenya  Information  and  Communication  Act  regulations.  The
revisions shall account for the changes in the sector, address
current  challenges  and  exploit  emerging  opportunities.
Regulations under revision include the following:68

 Compliance and Enforcement Regulations, 2023 
 Consumer Protection Regulations, 2023
 Domain Name Administration Regulations, 2023
 Electronic  Certification  Administration  Regulations,

2023
 Fair Competition Regulations, 2023
 General Licensing Regulations, 2023
 Numbering Regulations, 2023
 Postal and Courier Services Regulations, 2023
 Radio  Communications  and  Frequency  Spectrum

Regulations, 2023
 Tariff Regulations, 2023
 Type  Approval,  Importation  and  Distribution  of

Communication Equipment Regulations, 2023
 Universal Access and Service Regulations, 2023

One  of  the  applications  of  blockchain  technologies  is
cryptocurrencies.  In  Kenya,  the  uncertainties  associated  with
cryptocurrencies  have  generated  significant  debate  on
developing and implementing robust and up-to-date regulatory
provisions  to  mitigate  the  risks.69.  Some argue  that  adopting
cryptocurrencies threatens the centralisation of banking services
that allow regulators to play the watchdog role. The currencies
could also provide avenues for money laundering and financing
of terrorism activities.70 Kenya does not have express regulatory
provisions for cryptocurrencies. The Central Bank of Kenya has
only issued cautionary statements to the public71. In Civil  Suit
No. 08 of 2019 at the Milimani Commercial and Tax Division, the
judge ruled that cryptocurrencies can be identified as securities,
placing them within the regulatory scope of the Capital Markets
Authority72. 

Several  regulations  have  also  been  implemented,  especially
governing the financial services sector that has widely adopted
EDT.  These  include  the  Digital  Credit  Providers  Regulations
2021 by  the  Central  Bank  of  Kenya that  provide  for,  among
other  things,  licensing  of  digital  credit  businesses  and
requirements  for  digital  credit  providers  to  put  policies,
procedures and systems in place to ensure the confidentiality of
customers'  information  and  transactions.  These  include
circumstances  for  sharing  customer  information  with  licensed
credit reference bureaus (CRB), limitations on using customer
information  obtained  from  CRB,  to  whom  CRB  can  release

68 https://ict.go.ke
69 Arunda, B., (2021)
70 Ibid
71 Ibid
72 Ibid

11

Madara 
2.3



information,  and  various  consumer  protection  requirements.
These  include  receipts  for  all  transactions,  establishing
customer  complaints  resolution,  systems  integrity,  divulging
detailed  and  accurate  product  information,  avoiding  false
advertisements and variation of credit terms.

A review of tax laws has also sought to keep up with the digital
economy. For example, the Finance Act of 2019 and 2020 were
amended to address gaps concerning digital economy taxation.
Within  the  laws,  digital  service  includes  the  supply  of
downloadable  digital  content,  subscription-based  media,
software  programs,  products  on  online  marketplaces,  digital
media  content,  data  management  services,  search  engine
services, and any other supply determined by the Commissioner
of Domestic Taxes. Most of these services are built on EDT. In
the  Income Tax (Digital  Service Tax) Act 2020,  all  businesses
selling services online must pay a flat tax of 1.5% on the value
of services offered through digital platforms and a 16% Value
Added Tax (VAT). 

Implementation  of  these  tax  regimes  in  the  digital  space
continues to present several challenges, including73

(a) The  restrictive  nature  of  the  physical  presence
provisions, especially on the definition of permanent
establishment and the various double tax treaties in
determining income taxable in Kenya.

(b) Difficulties  in  collecting  taxes  from  non-residents
without  a  presence  in  Kenya,  especially  for  VAT
cases.

(c) Complexities  that  arise  from  seeking  to  define
consumption  places  for  calculating  VAT  and  other
indirect taxes.

(d) Difficulties in generating a taxpayers list to enhance
the identification of services provided, their status as
resident  or  non-resident,  the  value  of  services
provided and compliance levels with the relevant tax
laws.

(e) Inadequate access to digital transaction data, making
it challenging to identify and track online transactions.

73 Kenya Revenue Authority, (2020)

(f) Lack of consensus on taxation of the digital economy
at global levels.

Most researchers and innovators surveyed agreed or strongly
agreed (40%) that  the current  government  policies supported
research  and  development  of  applications  in  EDT/X-Data.
However, 32% disagreed or strongly disagreed, and 28% had a
neutral opinion. Of the surveyed policymakers, 50% agreed that
the policies were supportive, with 20% strongly disagreeing and
30% neutral. These similar sentiments show that there is room
for improvement of the existing policies supporting the research
on and application of EDT/X-Data. The surveyed policymakers
also indicated that research outputs adequately inform decisions
and policies that directly or indirectly affect EDT/X-Data (70%
strongly agreed or agreed). 

The surveyed stakeholders  recommended six  policy  areas to
strengthen or develop policies: 

(a) Capacity building: Policies to promote the training of
individuals  in  data  science  and  analytics,  machine
learning, and other related fields could help to build a
skilled workforce capable of developing and analysing
EDT/X-Data.

(b) Data collection and sharing: Clear policies to regulate
the collection, sharing, and use of data, including real-
time data, open data, and user-generated data, that
ensure ethical and legal data collection that is shared
in  a  way  to  maximise  its  benefits  to  stakeholders,
while protecting privacy and confidentiality. 

(c) Incentives  and  funding:  Policies  to  incentivise  the
adoption and use of EDT and X-Data, including the
provision of funding or tax incentives for stakeholders
who  invest  in  these  technologies,  as  well  as  the
establishment of prizes or awards for innovation and
best practices in the use of EDT and X-Data. 

(d) Public-private partnerships: Policies to promote public-
private partnerships that support the development and
application  of  EDT  and  X-Data,  including  the
development  of  joint  initiatives between government
agencies, private sector companies, and civil society
organisations,  as  well  as  the  establishment  of

12



regulatory frameworks and standards to guide these
partnerships.

(e) Intellectual  property:  Simplifying  the  patenting
process. 

(f) Sensitisation: Of all stakeholders on the importance of
EDT and X-Data.

Funding Resources

One major challenge that hinders research activities, especially
on  the  EDT/X-Data  in  Kenya,  is  limited  Research  and
Development  (R&D)  resources.  Few  researchers  and
institutions can fully sponsor their research activities, thus the
need for collaborative research projects to pool resources and
seek external research funding. Among the study participants,
60% had funding for their current research activities, with 55%
from  development  partners  and  27%  from  the  government.
Figure  2.5  shows  the  funding  sources  for  the  study  group's
research activities. When asked about the availability of funding
sources, 67% reported that they were few, and 29% could not
identify any. 

Strategic  government-to-government  partnerships  enhance
science  diplomacy  and  cooperation,  provide  a  platform  for
bilateral  collaborations in  innovation-based R&D and promote
access to a global  strategic  networking system and a bigger
pool  of  funding  resources.  Examples  of  funders  to  Kenya

include  the  UK  Foreign,  Commonwealth  and  Development
Office R&D funding (e.g. UK-Kenya Tech Hub) and GIZ-funded
Innovation hubs.

Figure 2.5: Sources of Research Funding for Surveyed 
EDT/X-Data Researchers and Innovators in Kenya

2.3  Maturity Level 

According to the study, the EDT/x-data ecosystem in Kenya is at
the growth stage of maturity. With reference to Table 2.6, all
the  fundamental  activities  had  a  growth  stage  rating,  except
research, which was assessed to be in the nascent stage.

13

Madara 
2.4



2.4 Summary

Based on the maturity model, the Kenya EDT/X-Data ecosystem
is  in  the  growth  stage  of  maturity.  The  research  dimension,
however, was assessed to be in the nascent stage, with the key
indicators getting stronger. Critical areas for improvement in this
dimension include low rates of intellectual property protection, a
relatively small number of researchers in the area, low research
output  (as  measured  through  journal  publications),  and
negligible  commercialisation  of  research  output.  These
weaknesses  must  be  addressed  for  the  ecosystem  to
significantly address Kenya's socio-economic challenges. All the
other  dimensions,  namely,  education,  end-use,  linkages,  and
implementation, are in the early stages of growth, placing the
country  on  a  promising  trajectory  to  harness  the  benefits  of
emerging digital  technologies and x-data applications to uplift
the well-being of her people and ensure that the country is not
left behind in the new digital space. 

3. MATURITY OF THE EMERGING DIGITAL 
TECHNOLOGY ECOSYSTEM IN SOUTH AFRICA

3.1 Primary Actors

The  study  identified  primary  actor  stakeholders  across  the
maturity model dimensions, including research, education, end-
use, and implementation. Actors were drawn from universities,
private education institutions, research institutions, and private
companies across various sectors.  A survey of twelve primary
actors  (seven  male,  five  female),  including  researchers  and
innovators, was conducted to obtain their perspectives on EDT
and augment the data obtained from secondary sources. The
actors  included  CEOs,  professors,  senior  lecturers,  project
managers, and postgraduate students.

Most respondents, 41.7%, had PhD degrees, 25% were ongoing
PhD  students,  and  33.3%  were  Masters  degree  graduates.
Further, they possessed varied experience levels in academia
and research, ranging from below 5 years of experience (41.7%)
to between 6 and 15 years of experience (33.3%) and over 15
years (25%). The following our findings.

Education

According  to  a  World  Bank  report,  over  10  South  African
universities  offer  programmes  and  modules  on  the  Fourth
Industrial Revolution (4IR) and related fields of AI and robotics,
either  as  short  learning  programmes  or  undergraduate  and
postgraduate  programmes  and  modules.  For  example,  the
University  of  Johannesburg  (UJ)  offers  undergraduate  and
postgraduate programmes specialising in AI. The university also
established a free Massive Open Online Course (MOOCS) on
the Introduction to Artificial Intelligence in the 4IR. The course
seeks  to  understand  what  AI  is,  its  purpose,  associated
possibilities,  and  implications,  ethically  and  productively.  The
course  provides  the  public  with  access  to  education  on  AI,
improving their awareness and knowledge of the basics of AI.
UJ  also  offers  other  courses  for  continuing  professional
development (CPD) for Professionals in Business in 4IR, AI and
Blockchain  Technology  in  accounting,  financial  risk,  taxation,
and risk management and control, among others.

Moreover, various South African Sector Education and Training
Authorities (SETA) have developed programmes concerning 4IR
technologies. Examples include the BankSETA and the Media,
Information  and  Communication  Technologies  SETA

(MICTSETA),  which  have  set  up  various  digital  courses  that
meet  their  sectors'  demands.  Beyond  the  offerings  of
programmes in EDT, many learning institutions are incorporating
EDT in some of their existing programmes and modules in line
with  skills  demands.  For  instance,  the  University  of  Pretoria
integrates notions of Industry 4.0 in all the modules, especially
in  business  and  computer  engineering  programmes,  with
departments  such  as  the  Computer  Science  Department
incorporating a big data science subject area into its Master's
course.74 

Private  sector  actors  also  provide  education  and  training  on
EDT  and  related  areas.  For  example,  the  Code4CapeTown
programme invests  in  women/girls  coders  and  programmers,
promoting  their  involvement  and  representation  in  the  field.
According  to  their  website,  participants  are  trained  in  web
development,  design  principles,  coding  using  different
languages  (Python,  javascript),  and  social  innovation.  Also,
Blockchain  Academy  provides  training  and  consulting  on
blockchain  technology  for  beginners,  executives,  and
developers on blockchain technology.75

The African Institute for Mathematical  Sciences (AIMS) South
Africa offers the AI for Science programme under the Master's
degree in Mathematical Science and seeks to attract students
from across Africa. The one-year programme is appropriate for
those  interested  in  Mathematics,  AI  and  Machine  Learning
(ML).76

Despite  the  view that  the  South  African  education  system is
advancing to include EDT in the curricula, more must be done to
link qualification offerings with new and changing job demands,
necessitating  additional  technology-specific  training  during
employment. Further, the number of STEM graduates produced
for academia does not meet demand, and there needs to be
more  systems  to  train  and  retrain  workers  in  emerging
technologies and ICT.77

However, an increasing number of technology hubs and sources
of finance are available in the country for startups. The lack of
skills and professional expertise can be attributed to the high
cost of educating and retraining the workforce.78 There is also a
lack  of  knowledge  on  blockchain.  For  example,  organisation
executives  associate  it  only  with  cryptocurrency  without
understanding it  can significantly  improve the industry.  South
Africa also needs more computing and engineering capacity to
train  large  language  models  for  machine  learning-based  AI
systems.79 These gaps can also be attributed to poor primary
and  secondary  school  education  and  the  limited  curricula  in
technical  and  vocational  colleges.80 Of  the  surveyed  study
participants, 33%  had taken various courses and training on
EDT/X-Data (see Table 3.1).

Research

EDT/X-Data applications have emerged as phenomenal drivers
of solutions to various corporate and socio-economic challenges
in both developing and developed countries. The applications
cut  across  several  sectors,  including  agriculture,  health,
governance, safety and security.  Table 3.2 shows the various
sectors targeted by the survey respondents. 

74Mzekandaba (2019)
75Dogo et al. (2019)
76AIMS (n.d.)
77Sutherland (2020)
78Akinradewo et al (2022)
79Barrett (2023)
80Jenkin and Naude (2018)

14

Madara 
2.5



Table 3.1: EDT/X-Data-Related Courses Attended by 
Surveyed EDT/X-Data Researchers and Innovators in South 
Africa

Course Percent

Artificial Intelligence 29%

EDT Applications 29%

Big data 14%

Data Science 14%

Machine learning 14%

Table 3.2: Sectors Targeted by Surveyed EDT/X-Data 
Researchers and Innovators in South Africa

Sector Number Percent

Health 3 23%

Industry and Manufacturing 
(Smart)

3 23%

Energy (including renewable 
energy)

2 15%

Business/Entrepreneurship 1 8%

Financial Services (FinTech) 1 8%

Education 1 8%

Agriculture 1 8%

Council for Scientific and Industrial Research (CSIR) is one of
the  leading  research  institutes  in  the  country  and  is  actively
involved in research, development and innovation (RD&I). CSIR
aims  to  enhance  socio-economic  prosperity  in  South  Africa
through the research, development, localisation, and diffusion of
technologies, thus contributing to industrial development. CSIR
has a research centre for Emerging Digital Technologies for the
Fourth  Industrial  Revolution  (EDT4IR),  which  seeks  to
strengthen  the  RD&I  community  of  practice  in  the  EDT.  The
centre  produces  research  knowledge  and  contributes  to
developing  capabilities  from  human  capital,  technology  tools
and  infrastructure  associated  with  AI,  advanced  Internet  of
Things  (IoT),  and  distributed  ledger  technology,  among other
things.  The  research  centre  also  focuses  on  building
demonstration  tools  for  the  practical  application  of
transformative  technology  and  offering  digital  tools  that  will
promote the implementation of smart solutions. The centre has
three  research  groups  aligned  to  its  focus  areas:  Artificial
Intelligence  and  Extended  Reality,  Distributed  Ledger
Technologies, and Advanced IoT.81

The  Centre  for  Artificial  Intelligence  Research  (CAIR)  is  an
example of a collaborative institution between universities and
other  stakeholders.  It  was  established  in  2011  and  is
coordinated by CSIR and funded by the Department of Science
and Innovation (DSI). CAIR links nine research groups from six
universities—the  University  of  Cape  Town,  the  University  of
KwaZulu-Natal,  North-West  University,  the  University  of
Pretoria,  Stellenbosch  University  and  the  University  of  the
Western Cape. The research focuses on various aspects of AI,
including adaptive and Cognitive Systems, AI and Cybersecurity,

81CSIR (n.d.)

AI  for  Development,  Applications  of  Machine  Learning,
Computational  Logic,  Ethics  of  AI,  Foundations  of  Machine
Learning,  Knowledge  Representation  and  Reasoning,  and
Probabilistic  Modelling.  CAIR  seeks  to  develop  world-class
research  capability  in  the  identified  areas  of  AI  through
consolidated,  applied  AI  research  initiatives,  building  an
accredited national and international AI research network that
promotes AI research and technology in the country.82

The Artificial  Intelligence Institute of South Africa (AIISA) was
founded  by  the  University  of  Johannesburg,  TUT(??),  the
Department of Communications and Digital  Technologies. The
institute is based on the vision of the Presidential Commission
on the Fourth Industrial Revolution. (PC4IR). AIISA focuses on
three sectors of the economy: the fourth industrial revolution in
manufacturing, healthcare, agriculture, and food processing, to
produce knowledge and applications  that  will  enhance South
Africa's competitiveness in the global AI sphere.83

Several  research  chairs  and  centres  have  been  established
across  the  country.  For  example,  the  University  of  Pretoria's
Faculty  of  Engineering,  Built  Environment  and IT (EBIT)  was
awarded  the  Chair  in  Machine  Learning  for  Sustainable
Development,  which focuses on the use of  AI  approaches to
enhance  the  quality  of  life  and  promote  sustainable
development while aiming to produce leading researchers in the
AI field.84

Also, the DSI/NRF-Sasol Research Chair in Energy and Power
Systems Modelling (UCT) focuses on various aspects of energy
transition.  It  contributes  to  developing  energy  solutions  and
advancing knowledge and skills for sustainable development in
the  country.  The Research  Chair  promotes  using  data-driven
approaches, such as AI,  artificial  neural  networks (ANN), and
machine  learning,  in  energy  planning  and  finding  optimal
solutions. It seeks to strengthen and improve public universities'
research and innovation capacity to generate high-quality and
excellent research and innovation outputs and researchers. The
Chair  has  the  advantage  of  exposure  to  industry  players,
specifically  Sasol,  promoting  research  outputs  based  on
academia-industry partnerships.

The University of Johannesburg also runs a research chair on
4IR  in  partnership  with  the  Education,  Training  and
Development Practices (ETDP) SETA. Other research activities
fall within 4IR Centres of Excellence in TVET Colleges, with 10
TVET colleges receiving financial  support  to  set  up 4IR mini
laboratories.  The  colleges  shall  collaborate  with  the  relevant
industries  to  execute  the  programmes.  Other  publicly  funded
research chairs are held in various South African universities
focusing  on  AI,  AI  systems,  blockchain  technologies  and
machine  learning  for  sustainable  development.  This  diversity
mirrors the responses from the surveyed participants, of whom
most (91.7%) had ongoing research based on some or all the
EDT (see Figure 3.1).

The  country  has  also  experienced  significant  growth  in  ICT
research  activities,  evidenced  by  the  growing  number  of
research hubs focusing on different aspects of EDT, including
mobile  robotics,  computational  intelligence,  knowledge
representation  and  reasoning,  and  human  language
technologies.85 These  groups  include  the  Computational
Intelligence Research Group (CIRG), Robotics and Agents Lab

82https://www.cair.org.za/about
83AIISA, (n.d), Stoltz (2023)
84UP News (2022)
85Ferrein and Meyer (2012)

15



(RAL),  Human  Language  Technologies  Group,  and  Mobile
Intelligent Autonomous Systems Group (MIAS).

There are also research activities in the Transport sector where
AI-based algorithms use real-time traffic data to alleviate traffic
congestion,  accidents  and  high  pollution  rates  caused  by
increased urban traffic flow. For example, data collected from
the Mikos Traffic Monitoring (essentially sensors embedded on
road surfaces to monitor and control vehicles) was used with AI
techniques to reduce and control traffic by predicting the traffic
flow ten minutes into the future.86

Journal publications play a critical role in disseminating research
findings  and  knowledge  transfer.  A  Scopus  search  of
publications  containing  "Artificial  intelligence"  AND  "South
Africa"  in  either  their  title,  abstract  or  keywords returned 332
publications.  Similar  searches  for  other  BRICS  countries
returned publications for Brazil at 780, Russia at 687, India at
2,434, and China at 6,882, ranking South Africa at the bottom.
When compared to other African countries, Kenya (79), Nigeria
(182)  and  Egypt  (191),  South  Africa  leads  on  the  continent.
South Africa's annual publications have risen steadily from 5 in
2009 to 63 in 2022. Of the 332 publications, 43% were journal
publications, and 40% were conference papers. By discipline,
23% were in computing science, 14% were in engineering, and
10% in social sciences. South African-based researchers were
first authors on most publications, and the main funders (where
acknowledged)  were  the  South  African  National  Research
Foundation, followed by the University of Johannesburg.  

The  relatively  low  number  of  publications  found  in  Scopus
mirrors  the  findings  from  our  survey.  Table  3.3  shows  the
distribution of participant publications related to EDT/X-Data. A
small proportion of the surveyed researchers (16.7%) in South
Africa's EDT/X-Data ecosystem had published in journals. The
majority,  83.3%,  however,  had  not.  Their  ongoing  research
activities are at different stages, as presented in Figure 3.2.

Patents  and  other  intellectual  property  protection  measures
provide  pathways  to  commercialising  research  output.87

Protecting  intellectual  properties  derived  from  research  and
innovation on EDT/X-Data is essential to safeguard the benefits
yielded upon deployment and commercialisation. However, only
8%  of  the  surveyed  study  participants  had  patented  or
copyrighted their research/innovation outputs related to EDT/X-
Data. These findings signal concern, especially noting that 63%

86Olayode et al. (2020)
87Jooste (2023)

indicated that their research outputs were ready for publication,
deployment,  or  commercialisation.  Critical  interventions  are
required  to  sensitise  and  facilitate  the  researchers  and
innovators to protect their work and build up on the 17% who
indicated that they are likely to file for a patent or copyright in
the next year.

Table 3.3: Number of publications Directly Related to 
EDT/X-Data by Surveyed Researchers and Innovators in 
South Africa

No. Publications No. Researchers Percent

0 10 83.3%

2 1 8.3%

10 1 8.3%

Figure 3.2: Stage of Current EDT/X-Data Research Activities
of Surveyed EDT/X-Data Researchers and Innovators in 
South Africa

Whereas funding, knowledge and skills are necessary to carry
out impactful research and develop solution-based applications
in  the  EDT/X-Data  ecosystem,  having  the  necessary
infrastructure, equipment, and a conducive policy environment is
equally  important.  Only  34%  of  the  surveyed  participants,
however, agreed that they have the necessary equipment and
tools  to  carry  out  research  work  in  the  area  of  EDT/X-Data,
whereas 42% were neutral and 25% disagreed. Therefore, more

16



must  be  done  to  provide  researchers  with  the  necessary
infrastructure. 

Survey  participants  were  also  asked  to  state  the  top  three
challenges  they  faced.  The  QCA  analysis  revealed  three
emergent  themes:  data,  rapid  advancement  in  EDT,  and
inadequate resources. A description of each theme is presented
in  Table  3.4,  together  with  sample  quotations  from  the
respondents,  thereby  placing  the  derived  theme  in  a  better
context.  Single  proposals  were  omitted.  The themes suggest
possible  intervention  areas  to  strengthen  the  EDT/X-Data
ecosystem in South Africa.  Issues surrounding data were the
primary  identified  challenges,  specifically  access,  availability
and data quality.

End Users

The  use  of  interactive  digital  technology  and  access  to  the
Internet  is  essential  to  enable organisations to  have a digital
presence in the era of 4IR. In South Africa, various sectors are
involved  in  end-use  activity,  including  construction,  built-
environment, mining, health, agriculture, energy and insurance.
Organisations,  businesses  and  individuals  all  use  various
technologies,  which include AI,  Blockchain,  IoT and Big Data
Analytics, to stay competitive. These technologies are adopted
in  multiple  functions  of  organisations,  including  supply  chain,
operations  and  marketing,  to  improve  services  and  remain
competitive  and relevant.  The technologies  enable  access  to
real-time  information  and  enhanced  communication  for  end-
users. 

Nonetheless, the rate of adoption of these technologies remains
slow. South Africa has a higher internet penetration rate than
other  African  countries.  As  of  2023,  the  country  had
approximately 43.48 million active internet users, accounting for

72.3%  of  its  population,  while  active  social  media  users
accounted  for  just  under  43%  of  the  population.88 Also,
approximately  78% of  the  population  used mobile  phones  to
access the Internet in 2022, and smartphone users accounted
for  a  third  of  the  country's  population.89 These  figures  shall
increase in the next few years as the South African government
targets  to  meet  universal  web  access  for  all  its  citizens'
households by 2024. Other factors affect access to the Internet
and the adoption of digital technologies in South Africa. Among
these  are  inadequacies  in  infrastructure  and  equipment;  for
example, many end-users do not have the required devices to
accommodate  the  levels  of  data  or  information  received  and
produced.  Also,  improved infrastructure is  needed in  parts  of
South Africa to boost Wi-Fi coverage and affordability.90

Digital  illiteracy and security  concerns are  some of  the main
hindrances to accessing and fully utilising various platforms and
data. For example, there are concerns about the illegal use of
collected  data  for  other  activities.  Within  the  business
community,  there are difficulties and complexities in changing
organisational culture to digital options and the fear of disruption
to existing jobs.91

As  such,  there  is  a  need  to  bridge  this  digital  divide.
Organisations  such  as  the  Silulo  and  tech  incubators  like
Bandwidth Barn have made efforts towards making the Internet
and the  digital  space accessible  for  entrepreneurs.  However,
these initiatives require support  to  remain sustainable and to
reach  a  wider  audience.  There  is  also  a  need  to  upskill

88Cowling (2023)
89Taylor (2023)
90Mlaba (2021)
91Vimal, et al. (2023)

17



individuals  and  organisations,  particularly  SMMEs,  on  digital
technologies.

Linkages

Over  the  past  years,  South  Africa  has  witnessed  a  rise  in
partnerships  to  advance  4IR  interventions.  Government
departments,  government  agencies,  and  universities  interact
through joint initiatives, for example, CAIR and AIISA. There are
also  interactions  between  academia  and  industry,  such  as
CSIR's interaction with universities through various programmes
and  research  centres.  These  interactions  are  essential  for
meeting skills  requirements and work placements,  which also
promotes  matching
skills  requirements  and
knowledge.92

Other interactions occur
across  government,
industry  and  academia
stakeholders. One such
example  is  the  DSI,
NRF  &  Sasol
partnership,  which
recently awarded grants
to  four  South  African
Research  Chairs
(SARChI)  and  six
Postdoctoral  Innovation
Programme Fellowships
to  stimulate  and
accelerate joint industry-
academia  research  in  clean  and  sustainable  energy  and
contribute to South Africa's transition towards sustainable clean
energy  and  a  Just  Energy  Transition  (JET).  SARChIs  are
examples of interactions between government (DSI), academic
institutions and funders (NRF) aimed at expanding research and
innovation  (R&I)  capacity  while  responding  to  social  and
economic  challenges  and  attracting  and  retaining  excellent
researchers to advance knowledge. 

Other examples of  interactions include the DHET Partnership
with CISCO and HUAWEI to ensure alignment of existing TVET
colleges  curricula  with  industry  demands  in  the  digital  skills
area. Through the CISCO agreement, 3 thousand lecturers are
being trained and upskilled in 50 TVET Colleges on ICT-related
qualifications.  The  Huawei  partnership  focuses  on  training
lecturers  from  TVET  colleges  to  support  the  introduction  of
subjects,  including  Routing  and Switching,  Big  Data,  Artificial
Intelligence, and Security and Cloud Computing.93

In collaboration with DFFE (DEA then), the Open Data South
Africa project hosted training and hackathon events related to
the South African Air Quality Information System to investigate
new  uses  of  air  quality  data  and  improved  techniques  for
monitoring  air  quality  issues.  This  example  illustrates
interactions  between  government  agencies  and  the  private
sector through joint initiatives enabling the adoption of Big Data
in  local  communities.  These  training  and  hackathon  events
involved teaching local communities how to use and monitor air
quality  data and tools  to  understand their  living environment.
They focused on equipping participants with skills for visualising
data and providing networking opportunities between associated
civil  society  groups  and  technology  students.  Participants

92Maisiri et al. (2019)
93Ministry of Higher Education, Science and Innovation website

included  technology  students,  young  developers  and
entrepreneurs.

Interactions for knowledge sharing are also taking place within
academia.  These  include  research  communities  in  Africa  in
which South Africa participates, for example, the Deep Learning
Indaba,  Data  Science  Africa  and  the  Regional  Academic
Network  on  IT  Policy.94 Locally,  the  South  African  Artificial
Intelligence  Association  (SAAIA)  provides  a  platform  for
professionals and enthusiasts,  including industry,  government,
academics,  and  startups,  to  promote  knowledge  sharing,
responsible  AI  commercialisation,  and  collaboration
opportunities.95

Conferences provide avenues
for  learning,  networking  and
dissemination  of  research
output. A significant number of
the surveyed researchers and
innovators,  however,  had yet
to  attend  (33%),  make  a
presentation  (75%)  or  take
part  in  organising  any
conference (92%) on EDT/X-
Data in South Africa. Overall,
42%  had  attended  only  one
conference  without  making
any  presentations,  and  17%
had  participated  in  and
presented at  one conference
(see Figure 3.3). Only 8% of
the surveyed participants had

taken  part  in  organising  a  conference.  When  asked  about
research collaborations, 67% of the surveyed participants had
ongoing  research  partnerships  with  industry  and  42%  with
universities and research institutions on EDT/X-Data.

Implementation

Implementation of EDT has occurred across various sectors in
the  country,  including  agriculture,  smart  metering,  finance,
insurance,  healthcare,  and  air  quality  information  systems.  A
brief presentation on representative examples follows. 

Agriculture

The  use  of  EDT  in  the  South  African  agricultural  sector  is
growing  to  improve  productivity  and  sustainability.  There  is
active  development  of  applications  for  crop  monitoring  and
management  through  satellite  imagery  and  drone  data;  soil
analysis and management using AI algorithms; pest and disease
detection  through  AI-powered  systems;  smart  irrigation;  and
livestock management. For example, in the Data-Intensive Farm
Management (DIFM) project run in various parts of the world,
including  South  Africa,  agricultural  firms  use  precision
technology  to  generate  and  provide  data-based,  site-specific
farm management guidance. Other organisations use drones to
provide  imagery,  AI,  machine  learning  and  big  data  for  crop
health analysis.96

The AI Platform (Hi Saai) was launched in 2023 by the Southern
African  Agri  Initiative  (Saai).  Hi  Saai  is  a  free  management
support tool that uses billions of Internet data points to establish
a framework that offers answers to farm-related questions within
minutes.  Its  services  include  business  and  financial-related
94Gwagwa et al. (2020)
95SAAIA (n.d.)
96 Ameer-Mia et al. (2020)

18



issues, chemical applications advice, production planning, and
marketing advice. Although it is in its early stages (post-pilot), Hi
Saai is expected to be an inclusive platform catering even to the
smallest  and  poorest  farmers,  provided  they  have  Internet
access. 

Air Quality Information System

The  South  African  Air  Quality  Information  System  (SAAQIS)
platform launched by the Department of Environmental Affairs --
now  known  as  the  Department  of  Forestry,  Fisheries  and
Environment  (DFFE)  --  obtains  and  visualises  data  from
nationwide  monitoring  stations.97 SAAQIS provides  air  quality
information  to  citizens  and  serves  as  a  research  portal  for
enhancing policy development on air quality issues.

Finance

Ukheshe  Technologies  is  a  fintech  organisation  that  offers
solutions for a single API that allows a wide range of payments.
The company partners with banks, telcos, and financial services
providers  to  increase  financial  inclusion  through  their  API
framework (Eclipse API), which can be customised to address
specific needs to ensure that clients pay and get paid. Some
industries utilising this service include banking, telcos, insurance
companies, fintechs, government, e-commerce and businesses
looking to replace cash handling.98

Healthcare

A data-driven healthcare system may contribute to an improved
standard of healthcare in South African rural areas (Babbar and
Rani,  2022).  For  example,  IoT  and  cloud  computing
technologies  have  created  remote  patient  monitoring  in  their
homes using networks of  IoT medical  devices equipped with
sensors and actuators to collect and process patient healthcare
data. The approach could reduce clinical costs and improve the
quality  of  life  of  patients  and  their  families.  Several  AI  in
Healthcare startups have also been established in South Africa
over the last decade to improve healthcare provision. 

For example, My Doctor is a platform that offers teleconsultation
and appointment booking options with healthcare providers. The
AI-based platform,  developed in  2020,  allows users to  locate
certified  healthcare  providers,  nurses,  and  home  healthcare
services based on clients' needs. Innohealth Technologies was
established in 2021 and uses clinical expertise, data science, AI
and machine learning to provide affordable, value-driven, and
customised innovative solutions to African healthcare problems.
The platform offers  imaging and lab diagnostics  solutions for
doctors and patients. The company uses its data models and
real-time data to determine and analyse trends, patterns, and
opportunities  for  improvement  to  ensure  more  improved
healthcare delivery. Innohealth has collected approximately 400
thousand  health  records  and  conducted  over  60  thousand
consultations.99 Accrad (Accelerated Radiology) was established
in 2020 to provide AI-based software for X-ray image analysis,
which helps  radiologists  accurately  diagnose patients.  Accrad
established CheXRad, a deep-learning algorithm that identifies
diseases on X-ray images at a level comparable to practising
radiologists.100

Insurance

Implementation of EDT in insurance companies is considered a
response  to  the  cumbersome  processes  and  poor  customer

97https://saaqis.environment.gov.za/, Open Data South Africa (2022)
98https://www.ukheshe.com/
99https://www.innohealthts.com/
100http://accrad.com/

service provided by other traditional approaches. For example,
Naked Insurance is an AI-driven company that has eliminated
human interaction in its buying process. Established in 2018, the
company offers motor and home cover. It enables their clients to
buy  cover  through  the  application  where  AI  bots  provide
estimates,  using the provided individual's  profile  and relevant
demographics, credit records, and required cover. The platform
stores data from every quote to improve the system's accuracy
by identifying how far off  estimates are from the actual value
when claims are processed.101 Granadilla Insurance also uses
an  AI  chatbot  named  'Nandi'  for  client  interactions,  avoiding
human interaction and physical "brick and mortar" infrastructure.
Nandi offers a quick and seamless onboarding user experience
with cover provided within 24 hours.102

Manufacturing

In the automotive and manufacturing industries, EDT have been
demonstrated  to  improve  organisational  performance,  lower
costs,  enhance quality  and accelerate responsiveness.103 The
autonomous  decision-making  powers  of  these  technologies
result  in  a  high  level  of  flexibility  on  the  shop  floor.  Smart
manufacturing  technology  will  likely  improve  productivity  by
12%, and overall equipment efficiency can improve by as much
as 35%.  Sappi, a company that provides everyday materials
made  from  wood  fibre-based  renewable  resources,  has
witnessed  the  impact  of  smart  technology  in  improving
international competitiveness. Its Saiccor Mill underwent a $480
million technology revamp, resulting in the construction of one of
the world's largest dedicated dissolving pulp plants. The revamp
provided  automation,  electrification  and  instrumentation
upgrades,  allowing  remote  access  and mobility.  Through this
project,  the  company  has  achieved  impressive  sustainability
impacts,  including a 17% reduction in water usage and a 40%
minimum reduction in its carbon footprint. It has increased its
production by 110 thousand tons.104

Mining

The  mining  sector  uses  big  data  and  EDT  in  its  logistics
functions,  where  logistics  systems  can  autonomously  relay
information to those responsible for the logistics process. It uses
IoT, AI, and data to plan machine loadings, vehicle schedules,
routes, and deliveries.105

Smart Metering

There  are  numerous  businesses  in  smart  metering  for  water
demand  management,  including  Aqua  Loc,  Amanzi  Meters,
Lesira-Teq Smart  Metering,  Krohne,  and Ideal  Repaid.  Smart
meters generate,  collect and display real-time data, enabling
prompt decision-making. Lesira-Teq, for example, is a Pretoria-
based  company  that  designs,  manufactures  and  supplies
technologically advanced, user-friendly, and reliable smart water
meters globally. The 20-year-old company continues to enhance
its product and service offerings through advanced innovation
and development  interventions that  allow for  intelligent,  high-
quality  water management.  IoT-enabled smart  meters provide
wireless transmission of daily updates on usage or leakages to
the end user, improving consumption management.106

Tourism

101https://www.naked.insure/blog
102https://granadillaworld.co.za/
103Bag et al. (2021c)
104Sappi (n.d.), CNN (2022)
105Bag et al. (2020)
106https://lesira.co.za/service/smart-water-meter/

19



To ensure a sustainable national park system, national parks in
South  Africa,  including  Kruger  National  Park,  Addo  Elephant
National Park, Table Mountain National Park and Garden Route
National Park, are using user-generated data from social media
to understand visitors' attitudes, perceptions and values of the
parks.  Questionnaires  were  previously  used  and  were  costly
and limited in space and time (capturing only a snapshot). User-
generated data provides real-time data in the form of videos,
text and pictures on social media, which proves helpful to the
parks.107

Secondary Actors

Several government departments and agencies were identified
as  secondary  actors  in  the  EDT/X-Data  ecosystem.  They
include the Department of Trade and Industry and Competition
(DTIC),  the  Department  of  Public  Service  and  Administration
(DPSA), and the Centre for Public Service Innovation (CPSI).
These departments and agencies guide firms to operate within
social boundaries through the national digital strategy. They also
enforce rules and regulations protecting the safe usage of data
within the framework of regulatory norms.108

There are actors in the private sector that influence the primary
actors' use of X-data. For example, the Open Data South Africa
(ODSA) partners, in collaboration with DPSA and CPSI, promote
the advanced use of government data in local communities for
social  impact  by  facilitating  community  engagements  and
updating the open data portal for easy navigation and access
(Open Data South Africa,  2022).  X-data consulting firms also
offer services such as data consolidation and warehousing, data
analysis and business analytics solutions that influence primary
actors' decision-making.

The government could play a more significant role in several
areas,  including  creating  awareness,  developing  relevant
policies  (data  protection  policies,  cybersecurity  policies),  and
upgrading digital  infrastructure to ensure connectivity that can
carry and sustain digital technology applications. Policymakers
in South Africa should also play a more prominent role in the
ecosystem.  Areas  for  strengthening  include the  setting  up  of
digital platforms for the public to submit information for analysis
and examination of trends (for example, in the health sector),
developing clear digital policies to avoid traceability and misuse
of  the  information,  policymakers,  and  creating  awareness  of
policies  among  the  public  to  encourage  the  submission  of
information by the public.109

Governance Frameworks

Government  regulation  dominates  South  Africa's  EDT
ecosystem  through  policies  and  laws  relating  to  intellectual
property,  data  protection,  and  research  and  development
incentives. There is also legislation that indirectly impacts EDT
and X-data innovation, for example, support for local technology
production or health and safety legislation. Examples of these
are outlined below.  First, regulations that directly impact EDT
and X-Data innovation include:

(a) Income  Tax  Act  of  1962: Section  11D  allows  for  a
deduction  equal  to  150%  of  expenditure  incurred
directly  for  research  and  development  and  an
accelerated  depreciation  deduction  (50:30:20)  for
capital  expenditure  incurred  on  machinery  or  plant
used for R&D.

107Hausmann et al. (2020)
108Bag et al. (2021c)
109Bag et al. (2021) and Sutherland (2020)

(b) Protection of Personal Information (POPI) Act - No.4
of  2013:  Section  71(1)  of  POPIA,  which  governs
automated decision-making, is crucial for AI systems,
given  their  inherent  problem-solving  ability.  This
section protects data subjects from being subjected to
a  decision  based  solely  on  automated  decision-
making, which results in legal consequences for the
data subject and the profiled data subject.

(c) Protection of Personal Information (POPI) Act:  All of
this Act but especially No.4 of 2013, section 57(1)(a)
that  requires  a  responsible  party  to  obtain  prior
authorisation  from  the  Information  Regulator  if  it
intends  to  process  any  unique  identifiers  of  data
subjects  (i)  for  another  purpose  than  intended  at
collection  and  (ii)  to  link  the  information  with
information processed by other responsible parties.

(d) Copyright  Act,  No.98  of  1978: Provides  for  the
protection  of  computer  programs  and  includes
computer-assisted  and  computer-generated  works.
The  author  of  a  computer-generated  work  will  be
regarded as the person who created the AI system or
the algorithm used to create the work.

(e) Patent Act 57 of 1978 and amendments: South Africa
has related copyright, designs and trademark acts. In
2018, the government began a phased approach to
revising the country's IP policies to ensure they are
up-to-date and meet global standards. The first phase
of  this  revision  focused  on  the  regulations  in  the
medical  and health sectors and how they align with
international standards.  They provide a framework for
patenting  new  inventions  in  trade,  industry  or
agriculture. 

(f) Intellectual  Property  Rights  from  Publicly  Financed
Research  and  Development  Act  51  of  2008:
Determines  the  ownership  of  inventions  developed
with public funding and the distribution of profits from
the commercialisation. 

Those that indirectly impact EDT and X-Data innovation include:

(a) Commercialisation  Framework  (2015/2016):  In
collaboration  with  the  Development  Bank  of  South
Africa and the Industrial Development Corporation, the
DSI  supports  locally  developed  technologies  with
commercial potential.

(b) The Occupational Health and Safety Act 85 of 1993:
Provides for the health and safety of persons at work
and  those  in  connection  with  the  use  of  plant  and
machinery.  Such  legislation  can  incentivise  firms  to
develop new AI-driven safety technologies or create
additional  compliance  requirements  hindering
innovation.

(c) Consumer  Protection  Act  68  of  2008: Aims,  among
others, to promote fair business practices and protect
consumers  from  unconscionable,  unfair,
unreasonable, unjust, or improper trade practices and
deceptive, misleading, unfair, or fraudulent conduct.

(d) Skills  Development  Act,  1998  and  amendment  of
2003  and  Skills  Development  Levies  Act,  1999:
Dedicated regulations that  set  up training and skills
development  institutions  known  as  SITAs  and

20

Madara 
3.2 Secondary Actors



imposed  a